public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX & N 2 # sostantivi alterài
SFX & 0 eto/BI [lnr]
SFX & o eto/BI o
#SFX & 0 eta/D [lnr]
#SFX & a eta/D a
#SFX & 0 òto/BI [lƚnr]
#SFX & . òto/BI [aeo]
#SFX & 0 ato/BI [lƚnr]
#SFX & . ato/BI [aeo]
#SFX & . on/D [eo]
#SFX & a ona/D a
#SFX & 0 to/BI [^aolƚnr]
#SFX & . òl/B ?
#SFX & . òƚo/B ?
#SFX & . èl/B ?
#SFX & . èƚo/B ?
#SFX & . el/B ?
#SFX & . eƚo/B ?
#SFX & . in/B ?
#SFX & . uŧo/BI ?
#SFX & . uso/B ?
#SFX & . ŧin/B [?]
#SFX & . eŧin/B ?
#SFX & . esin/B ?
#SFX & . sin/B [?]
#SFX & . ŧuŧo/B [?]
#SFX & . suso/B [?]
#SFX & . eŧuŧo/B ?
#SFX & . esuso/B ?
#SFX & . đin/B [?]
#SFX & . eđin/B ?
#SFX & . edin/B ?
#SFX & . exin/B ?
#SFX & . đuŧo/B [?]
#SFX & . eđuŧo/B ?
#SFX & . eduso/B ?
#SFX & . exuso/B ?
#SFX & . lin/B [?]
#SFX & . olin/B ?
#SFX & . oƚin/B ?
#SFX & . luŧo/B [?]
#SFX & . oluŧo/B ?
#SFX & . oluso/B ?
#SFX & . oƚuso/B ?
#SFX & . rin/B [?]
#SFX & . erin/B ?
#SFX & . ruŧo/B [?]
#SFX & . eruŧo/B ?
#SFX & . ruso/B [?]
#SFX & . eruso/B ?
#SFX & . aŧo/BI ?
#SFX & . aso/B ?
#SFX & . uko/B ?

SFX % N 35 # numerali - koletivi
SFX % ète etena/D ète
SFX % ète etèna/D ète
SFX % òto otena/D òto
SFX % òto otèna/D òto
SFX % e ena/D ove
SFX % e èna/D ove
SFX % èxe exena/D ièxe
SFX % èxe exèna/D ièxe
SFX % èxe eŧena/D ièxe
SFX % èxe esena/D ièxe
SFX % ièxe exena/D ièxe
SFX % ièxe exèna/D ièxe
SFX % ièxe eŧena/D ièxe
SFX % ièxe esena/D ièxe
SFX % úndexe undexena/D úndexe
SFX % úndexe undexèna/D úndexe
SFX % ódexe odexena/D ódexe
SFX % ódexe odexèna/D ódexe
SFX % édexe edexena/D édexe
SFX % édexe edexèna/D édexe
SFX % òrdexe ordexena/D òrdexe
SFX % òrdexe ordexèna/D òrdexe
SFX % índexe indexena/D índexe
SFX % índexe indexèna/D índexe
SFX % i ena/D nti
SFX % i èna/D nti
SFX % a ena/D nta
SFX % a èna/D nta
SFX % o enèr/BV nto
SFX % e èr/B mi[lƚ]e
SFX % e ar/B mi[lƚ]e
SFX % 0 èr/B ion
SFX % 0 ar/B ion
SFX % o èr/B iardo
SFX % o ar/B iardo


SFX £ N 10 # numeraŧion latina
SFX £ 0 I [IVXLCDM]
SFX £ 0 II [IVXLCDM]
SFX £ 0 III [IVXLCDM]
SFX £ 0 IV [XLCDM]
SFX £ 0 V [IXLCDM]
SFX £ 0 VI [XLCDM]
SFX £ 0 VII [XLCDM]
SFX £ 0 VIII [XLCDM]
SFX £ 0 IX [XLCDM]
SFX £ 0 X I

PFX $ N 60 # numeraŧion latina
PFX $ 0 X [LC]
PFX $ 0 L X
PFX $ 0 C [XLCDM]
PFX $ 0 CX [LC]
PFX $ 0 CL X
PFX $ 0 CC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 CCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 CCL X
PFX $ 0 CCC [XL]
PFX $ 0 CCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 CCCL X
PFX $ 0 CD [XL]
PFX $ 0 CDX [LC]
PFX $ 0 CDL X
PFX $ 0 D [XLC]
PFX $ 0 DX [LC]
PFX $ 0 DL X
PFX $ 0 DC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 DCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 DCL X
PFX $ 0 DCC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 DCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 DCCL X
PFX $ 0 DCCC [XL]
PFX $ 0 DCCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 DCCCL X
PFX $ 0 CM [XL]
PFX $ 0 CMX [LC]
PFX $ 0 CML X
PFX $ 0 M [XLCDM]
PFX $ 0 MX [LC]
PFX $ 0 ML X
PFX $ 0 MC [XLCMD]
PFX $ 0 MCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCL X
PFX $ 0 MCC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCCL X
PFX $ 0 MCCC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MCD [XL]
PFX $ 0 MCDX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCDL X
PFX $ 0 MD [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MDX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDL X
PFX $ 0 MDC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MDCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDCL X
PFX $ 0 MDCC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MDCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDCCL X
PFX $ 0 MDCCC [XL]
PFX $ 0 MDCCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDCCCL X
PFX $ 0 MCM [XL]
PFX $ 0 MCMX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCML X
PFX $ 0 MM [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MMX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MML X



#PFX d Y 1
#PFX d 0 stra .

#PFX e Y 1
#PFX e 0 pre .
