public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
grando/BI&	po:adjective po:noun
picenin/B&	po:adjective po:noun
sète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
òto/%	po:numeral_cardenal
nove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dièxe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
úndexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dódexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
trédexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuatòrdexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuíndexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sédexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexsète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexesète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixsète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixesète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixisète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexdòto/I%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexedòto/I%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixdòto/I%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixedòto/I%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexnove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexenove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexnòve/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexenòve/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixnove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixenove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixnòve/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixenòve/%	po:numeral_cardenal
vinti/%	po:numeral_cardenal
trenta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuaranta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
ŧinkuanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sinkuanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sesanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
setanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
otanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
novanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
ŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
doxento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
duxento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
doŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dosento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
trexento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
treŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
tresento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuatroŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuatrosento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
ŧinkueŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sinkuesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sieŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
siesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
seteŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
setesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
otoŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
otosento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
noveŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
novesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
mile/%	po:numeral_cardenal
miƚe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
melion/TU%	po:numeral_cardenal
meƚion/TU%	po:numeral_cardenal
milion/TU%	po:numeral_cardenal
miƚion/TU%	po:numeral_cardenal
meliardo/T%	po:numeral_cardenal
meƚiardo/T%	po:numeral_cardenal
miliardo/T%	po:numeral_cardenal
miƚiardo/T%	po:numeral_cardenal
I/£Z	po:numeral_latin
V/£Z	po:numeral_latin
X/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
XX/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
XXX/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
L/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
C/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
D/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
M/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
đal/B&	po:adjective po:noun al:đai
dal/B&	po:adjective po:noun al:dai
xal/B&	po:adjective po:noun al:xai
xaƚo/B&	po:adjective po:noun
bixo/BI&	po:adjective po:noun
roso/BI&	po:adjective po:noun
senerin/B&	po:adjective po:noun
turkin/B&	po:adjective po:noun
banko/B&	po:noun
biso/BI&	po:noun
buxiaro/B&	po:adjective po:noun
buxo/BI&	po:noun
dolso/BW&	po:adjective po:noun
dolŧo/BIW&	po:adjective po:noun
fiapo/BI&	po:adjective
fredo/BI&	po:adjective po:noun
gramo/B&	po:adjective po:noun
graso/B&	po:adjective po:noun
joso/B&	po:noun
joŧo/BI&	po:noun
ɉoso/B&	po:noun
ɉoŧo/BI&	po:noun
kalso/B&	po:noun
kalŧo/BI&	po:noun
karo/B&	po:adjective po:noun
kaval/BU&	po:noun
kavaƚo/B&	po:noun
masco/B&	po:noun
maso/B&	po:noun
maŧo/BI&	po:noun
muso/BI&	po:noun
neodo/B&	po:noun
orso/B&	po:noun
peso/BI&	po:noun
seco/B&	po:noun
sior/C&	po:adjective po:noun
skur/B&	po:adjective po:noun
steko/BI&	po:noun
strako/B&	po:adjective
suko/B&	po:noun
tondo/B&	po:adjective po:noun
ŧuko/BI&	po:noun
vaxo/T&	po:noun
xjonfo/BI&	po:adjective
xɉonfo/BI&	po:adjective
aspro/B&	po:adjective
balordo/B&	po:adjective
baƚordo/B&	po:adjective
busolà/B&	po:noun
despetoxo/BI&	po:adjective
duro/B&	po:adjective
furbo/B&	po:adjective po:noun
garbo/B&	po:adjective
indeño/B&	po:adjective po:noun
induxio/T&	po:noun
inđeño/B&	po:adjective po:noun
inxeño/B&	po:adjective po:noun
mul/B&	po:adjective po:noun al:mui
muƚo/B&	po:adjective po:noun
paonaso/BI&	po:adjective po:noun
paonaŧo/BI&	po:adjective po:noun
rabio/T&	po:noun
servidor/CV&	po:noun
sparaño/T&	po:noun
stiso/T&	po:noun
stiŧo/TI&	po:noun
torbio/B&	po:adjective
turbio/B&	po:adjective
xbiro/B&	po:noun
xejo/B&	po:noun
xeɉo/B&	po:noun
karexo/T&	po:noun
